Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB711.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 36.230 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There shall be a Unit of Civil Air Patrol in the Department of Military Affairs. The
unit shall consist of the Kentucky wing of the Civil Air Patrol and any other units
and personnel as are added by administrative order.
(2) The commanding officer or his or her designee of the Kentucky wing of the Civil
Air Patrol shall be ex officio the head of the unit.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/24/2026 10:18 AM Jacketed